Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
CHAPTER 23 Circuit Courts Generally [Repealed]

23.010.
Court of record — Original civil jurisdiction — Judge conservator of the peace. [Repealed.]

23.020.
Franklin Circuit Court — Venue in revenue and fiscal cases. [Repealed.]

23.030.
Appellate civil jurisdiction. [Repealed.]

23.032.
Appeal from fine or imprisonment — Appeals by city. [Repealed.]

23.035.
Reversal, vacation or modification of judgments. [Repealed.]

23.040.
Circuit court districts. [Repealed.]

23.045.
Court of Appeals to establish circuit court terms. [Repealed.]

23.050.
Terms of court. [Repealed.]

23.055.
Supreme court to supervise circuit court dockets. [Repealed.]

23.060.
Court to be held at more than one place in certain counties. [Repealed.]

23.070.
Juries and conduct of court when held at more than one place. [Repealed.]

23.080.
Civil and criminal cases, where tried when court held at more than one place. [Repealed.]

23.085.
Places of holding court in certain counties containing only fourth-class cities. [Repealed.]

23.090.
Fiscal court to provide court facilities — Order dividing terms — Assignment of cases — Acquisition of quarters in city by fiscal court for courts and county purposes. [Repealed.]

23.091.
Fiscal court and urban-county governing body to furnish facilities and financial support until January 1, 1978. [Repealed.]

23.095.
National and state flags to be provided for each courtroom — Size. [Repealed.]

23.100.
Election to determine whether court to be held at place other than county seat. [Repealed.]

23.110.
Extension of term — Special terms — When held — How called — Notification. [Repealed.]

23.120.
When special term mandatory — Chief justice may call — Notice. [Repealed.]

23.125.
Motion day to be established by rule — Precedence over assigned juridical day. [Repealed.]

23.130.
Continuance of undisposed business. [Repealed.]

23.140.
No discontinuance on failure to sit. [Repealed.]

23.145.
Defendant confined on misdemeanor charge, trial by county judge — Transfer — Proceedings after judgment. [Repealed.]

23.150.
Orders and judgments in vacation or in chambers. [Repealed.]

23.160.
When criminal and penal cases heard. [Repealed.]

23.170.
Oath of circuit judge. [Repealed.]

23.180.
Judges’ commissions — Appointment of special judges — Record of. [Repealed.]

23.190.
Successor of judge may sign orders. [Repealed.]

23.200.
Salary of judges. [Repealed.]

23.210.
Salary may be supplemented. [Repealed.]

23.215.
Miscellaneous expense allowance for judges. [Repealed.]

23.220.
Circuit judges to act as special judges — Commission. [Repealed.]

23.230.
Special judge by agreement if regular judge absent or cannot preside, or office is vacant — Designation of special judge by chief justice of Supreme Court. [Repealed.]

23.240.
Designation of special judge by Chief Justice in courts not of continuous session. [Repealed.]

23.250.
Designation of special judge by Chief Justice in courts of continuous session. [Repealed.]

23.260.
Special judge for special term. [Repealed.]

23.270.
Refusal of circuit judge to act — Effect. [Repealed.]

23.280.
Clerks to notify chief justice of terms — Roster to be kept. [Repealed.]

23.290.
Pay for special judges — Approval of claims. [Repealed.]

23.300.
Special circuit judge. [Repealed.]

23.310.
Eligibility of regular circuit judges for appointment as special circuit judges; contributions to special circuit judge fund. [Repealed.]

23.320.
Application for appointment as special circuit judge. [Repealed.]

23.330.
Duties of special circuit judges; prohibited activity; removal. [Repealed.]

23.340.
Compensation of special circuit judges; expense allowance. [Repealed.]

23.350.
Special circuit judge fund; contributions. [Repealed.]

23.360.
Committee to control and manage fund; appoinment, terms, vacancies, chairman, meetings, expenses. [Repealed.]

23.370.
Investment of fund; pro rata reduction of allowances. [Repealed.]

23.380.
Refund of contributions to defeated candidate for re-election as circuit judge. [Repealed.]